Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4617
Impermissible appointment.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 30-4616, an exercise of a power of appointment in favor of an impermissible appointee is ineffective.

(b) An exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a permissible appointee is ineffective to the extent the appointment is a fraud on the power.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 40.